Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 217.005 TO 217.215 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "end consumer" means a person who is the last
person to purchase any food product and who does not resell the food product.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the secretary shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Exclude slaughtering and processing of poultry on a farm for the purpose
of conducting sales under 9 C.F.R. sec. 381.10 if the slaughtered and
processed poultry or poultry products are sold to an end consumer on a
farm, at a farmers market, or at a roadside stand;
(b) Require that poultry or poultry products processed under this section that
are sold on a farm be refrigerated at the point of sale and labeled in
compliance with the requirements of 9 C.F.R. sec. 381.10; and
(c) Require that poultry or poultry products processed under this section that
are sold at a farmers market or at a roadside stand be frozen at the point of
sale and labeled in compliance with the requirements of 9 C.F.R. sec.
381.10.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, no local
governmental agency shall require any additional certification or inspection of
poultry or poultry products of a farmer acting in compliance with the
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
Page 1 of 1
BR132200.100 - 1322 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:16 PM Jacketed